New Jersey, session 222, A823.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.50:2-3 is amended to read as follows: 50:2-3.  The license fee shall be fixed by the commissioner, with the approval of the council, at not less than $10 or more than $20 for a resident's recreational shellfish license, at not less than $20 or more than $40 for a nonresident's recreational shellfish license, at not less than $50 or more than $100 for a resident's commercial shellfish license, and at not less than $250 or more than $500 for a nonresident's commercial shellfish license.  No fee shall be charged for a recreational shellfish license to a person who is 62 or more years of age, or to an honorably discharged veteran or active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States, provided the person is a resident of this State.  A juvenile recreational shellfish license shall be available for $2 for resident or nonresident persons under 14 years of age. (cf: P.L.2007, c.338, s.26) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.